Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,227
Forcible entry and detainer; trial by jury; verdict.

If a jury is demanded by either party, the proceedings shall be in all respects as in other cases. If the jury shall find that the complaint is true, they shall render a general verdict of guilty against the defendant; if not true, then a general verdict of not guilty; if true in part, then a verdict setting forth the facts they find true.

Laws 1929, c. 82, § 126, p. 311;

C.S.1929, § 22-1210;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,127;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 77;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-577.

A forcible entry and detainer action is a civil suit subject to the normal rules of a civil proceeding, including the power of the court to sustain a motion for a directed verdict in favor of either party at the close of all evidence. Otto v. Hongsermeier Farms, 217 Neb. 45, 348 N.W.2d 422 (1984).